Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1908
Medical radiography,
defined.

Medical radiography means the application
of radiation to humans for diagnostic purposes, including, but not limited
to, utilizing
proper:

(1) Radiation
protection for the patient, the radiographer, and others;

(2) Radiation-generating equipment operation and quality control;

(3) Image production and
evaluation;

(4) Radiographic procedures;

(5) Processing of films;

(6) Positioning
of patients;

(7) Performance methods to achieve optimum radiographic technique
with a minimum of radiation exposure; and

(8) Patient care and management as it relates
to the practice of medical radiography.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 646;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 3.